Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-928
Baccalaureate general academic, defined.

Baccalaureate general academic shall mean those degree programs intended by an institution to prepare an individual to function in a variety of different career areas or to prepare such individual for further academic study. Programs at this level shall allow an individual to acquire a general education at the baccalaureate level in arts, sciences, and humanities.

Laws 1978, LB 756, § 12.